Utah statutes.
35A-2-203.   Employment centers.

(1)  In each county within an economic service area, the executive director shall:

(a)  designate the location of one or more employment centers, as defined in Section 35A-1-102, in which the services are provided by the department; or

(b)  coordinate with the department to establish access to the services provided by the department by means other than an employment center.

(2)  An employment center shall provide a comprehensive program of employment services including job placement, job development, stabilization, assessment, and job training through its employment counselors as part of a system of unified case management.

(3)  The department may make services that are provided through employment centers under this section accessible through electronic linkage.



Amended by Chapter 188, 2011 General Session

